Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-616
License; renewal.

To renew a license as a certified nurse midwife, the applicant shall have a current certification by a board-approved certifying body to practice nurse midwifery.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 20;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 57;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 77;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 42;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 64;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 48;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 108;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 90;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1757;

Laws 2007, LB185, § 25;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 228.